tests/data/postgen-short.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="test"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
   <pardef n="le">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/></l>
          <r>se<b/>la<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">

	  <e>
		  <p>
			  <l><a/>e<b/>a</l>
			  <r>a</r>
		  </p>
	  </e>
	  <e>
		  <p>
			  <l><a/>E<b/>a</l>
			  <r>A</r>
		  </p>
	  </e>

  </section>

</dictionary>
